West Virginia, session 2026, SB24.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1. PUBLIC ENERGY AUTHORITY OF THE STATE OF WEST VIRGINIA. §5D-1-24. West Virginia Intrastate Energy Use Act. (a) The Tenth Amendment to the Constitution of the United States guarantees to the states and their people all powers not explicitly granted to the federal government, reserving certain powers to West Virginia as understood at its admission to statehood in 1863. This guarantee is a contractual matter between West Virginia and the United States; and The Ninth Amendment ensures rights not specified in the Constitution, reserving such rights to the people of West Virginia as understood at statehood in 1863. This is also a contractual aspect of the compact between West Virginia and the United States.Regulation of intrastate commerce, including the environmental impact of such activities, falls under the states' jurisdiction under the Ninth and Tenth Amendments, specifically retained by West Virginia.(b) "Borders of West Virginia "means the geographical boundaries as described in the West Virginia Constitution."Coal mine" means operations and facilities related to the extraction of coal from West Virginia's substrata."Oil well" means those operations and facilities producing oil from the substrata within West Virginia. "Gas well" means operations and facilities producing natural gas from the substrata within West Virginia. (c) Environmental regulation within West Virginia for business activities involving coal, oil, and natural gas, where the products are consumed or retained within the state, is under the jurisdiction of the West Virginia Department of Energy. (d) Any coal mine, oil, or gas well in West Virginia producing these resources for commercial or private use within the state, including those undergoing primary conversion processes, shall first receive an operational permit from the West Virginia Department of Energy after compliance certification with applicable state and federal laws. (e) The Legislature asserts that the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency (EPA), under its claim to regulate interstate commerce, lacks authority to deny operational permits for these resources since they do not enter interstate commerce.(f) This act applies to coal, oil, and natural gas produced within West Virginia and pertains solely to the issuance of operational permits for coal mines, oil, and gas wells as required by environmental regulations such as the Clean Water Act or equivalent statutes. It does not limit the enforcement of other state or federal environmental laws or regulations.(h) Power Generation: This act extends to include the regulation of power generation facilities in West Virginia using coal, oil, or natural gas, ensuring that such facilities also fall under the purview of the WVDEP for environmental compliance when the energy is generated and consumed within the state.(i) This legislation is intended to clarify and assert West Virginia's authority over its natural resources, particularly in terms of environmental regulation, in alignment with constitutional rights and state sovereignty.